Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FILMNORTH; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to FilmNorth, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to renovate property located at 2447 University Avenue West in the city of St. Paul, to serve as a multiuse facility. The facility will include a dedicated workforce training center for film industry jobs; an archive for short films, documentaries, experimental films, and narrative films made by Minnesota media artists, accessible to the public; a soundstage and community events space; and affordable office space for low income artists. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end